Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 2
ELECTRONIC FUNDS TRANSFERS

11-105-201. Short title. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1117, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 29, § 1, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

Prior to its repeal, this section was similar to former § 11-6.5-101 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-105-202. Legislative declaration. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1117, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 29, § 2, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

Prior to its repeal, this section was similar to former § 11-6.5-102 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-105-203. Conditions of authority. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1117, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 29, § 3, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

Prior to its repeal, this section was similar to former § 11-6.5-104 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-105-204. Conditions for retailers. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1118, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 30, § 4, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

Prior to its repeal, this section was similar to former § 11-6.5-105 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-105-205. Powers of the banking board. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1119, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 31, § 5, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

Prior to its repeal, this section was similar to former § 11-6.5-106 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-105-206. Jurisdiction of the district court. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1119, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 31, § 6, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

Prior to its repeal, this section was similar to former § 11-6.5-107 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-105-207. Fees. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1119, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 32, § 7, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

Prior to its repeal, this section was similar to former § 11-6.5-108 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-105-208. Consumer protection.

Every Colorado bank using a communications facility shall provide its account holders, at the time the facility is used, with a receipt or record of each banking transaction initiated at a facility. Such receipt or record shall be admissible as evidence in any legal action or proceeding and shall constitute prima facie proof of the banking transaction evidenced by such receipt or record. When a Colorado bank furnishes a statement of a demand, savings, or loan account to an account holder, such statement shall reflect each banking transaction affecting such account made by the account holder at a communications facility during the period covered by the statement.

With respect to any card or other device issued to an account holder for use at a communications facility, any account holder whose card or device is lost or stolen and subsequently used by an unauthorized person shall only be liable for the lesser of fifty dollars or the amount of money, goods, or services obtained by the unauthorized use prior to notice to the Colorado bank that issued the card or device of the theft or loss. If the unauthorized use occurs through no fault of the account holder, no liability shall be imposed on the account holder.

No account holder shall be held liable for any loss occurring as the result of any tampering or manipulation of a communications facility unless such account holder performs or authorizes such acts.

Commercial banks shall continue to offer customers the right to use checking accounts. No bank shall make the use of such accounts burdensome with intent to discourage such use. The banking board shall issue rules designed to prevent violation of this provision.

No agreement to operate or share a communications facility may prohibit, limit, or restrict the right of the operator or owner of the communications facility to charge a customer conducting a transaction using an account from a foreign bank a usual and customary access fee or surcharge unless prohibited under state or federal law.

Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection (5), nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit, limit, or otherwise restrict the right of the operator or owner of a communications facility from voluntarily entering into an agreement to participate in a surcharge-free network.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1119, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(5) added, p. 605, § 1, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-6.5-109 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-105-209. Permissive sharing among dissimilar institutions. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1120, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 32, § 8, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

Prior to its repeal, this section was similar to former § 11-6.5-110 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-105-210. No operation by bank employees. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1120, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 32, § 9, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

Prior to its repeal, this section was similar to former § 11-6.5-111 as it existed prior to 2003.